Utah statutes.
76-7-305.5.   Requirements for printed materials and informational video.

(1)  In order to ensure that a woman's consent to an abortion is truly an informed consent, the Department of Health shall, in accordance with the requirements of this section:

(a)  publish printed materials; and

(b)  produce an informational video.

(2)  The printed materials and the informational video described in Subsection (1) shall:

(a)  be scientifically accurate, comprehensible, and presented in a truthful, nonmisleading manner;

(b)  present adoption as a preferred and positive choice and alternative to abortion;

(c)  be printed and produced in a manner that conveys the state's preference for childbirth over abortion;

(d)  state that the state prefers childbirth over abortion;

(e)  state that it is unlawful for any person to coerce a woman to undergo an abortion;

(f)  state that any physician who performs an abortion without obtaining the woman's informed consent or without providing her a private medical consultation in accordance with the requirements of this section, may be liable to her for damages in a civil action at law;

(g)  provide information on resources and public and private services available to assist a pregnant woman, financially or otherwise, during pregnancy, at childbirth, and while the child is dependent, including:

(i)  medical assistance benefits for prenatal care, childbirth, and neonatal care;

(ii)  services and supports available under Section 35A-3-308;

(iii)  other financial aid that may be available during an adoption; and

(iv)  services available from public adoption agencies, private adoption agencies, and private attorneys whose practice includes adoption;

(h)  describe the adoption-related expenses that may be paid under Section 76-7-203;

(i)  describe the persons who may pay the adoption related expenses described in Subsection (2)(h);

(j)  describe the legal responsibility of the father of a child to assist in child support, even if the father has agreed to pay for an abortion;

(k)  describe the services available through the Office of Recovery Services, within the Department of Human Services, to establish and collect the support described in Subsection (2)(j);

(l)  state that private adoption is legal;

(m)  in accordance with Subsection (3), describe the probable anatomical and physiological characteristics of an unborn child at two-week gestational increments from fertilization to full term, including:

(i)  brain and heart function; and

(ii)  the presence and development of external members and internal organs;

(n)  describe abortion procedures used in current medical practice at the various stages of growth of the unborn child, including:

(i)  the medical risks associated with each procedure;

(ii)  the risk related to subsequent childbearing that are associated with each procedure; and

(iii)  the consequences of each procedure to the unborn child at various stages of fetal development;

(o)  describe the possible detrimental psychological effects of abortion;

(p)  describe the medical risks associated with carrying a child to term; and

(q)  include relevant information on the possibility of an unborn child's survival at the two-week gestational increments described in Subsection (2)(m).

(3)  The information described in Subsection (2)(m) shall be accompanied by the following for each gestational increment described in Subsection (2)(m):

(a)  pictures or video segments that accurately represent the normal development of an unborn child at that stage of development; and

(b)  the dimensions of the fetus at that stage of development.

(4)  The printed material and video described in Subsection (1) may include a toll-free 24-hour telephone number that may be called in order to obtain, orally, a list and description of services, agencies, and adoption attorneys in the locality of the caller.

(5)  In addition to the requirements described in Subsection (2), the printed material described in Subsection (1)(a) shall:

(a)  be printed in a typeface large enough to be clearly legible;

(b)  in accordance with Subsection (6), include a geographically indexed list of public and private services and agencies available to assist a woman, financially or otherwise, through pregnancy, at childbirth, and while the child is dependent;

(c)  except as provided in Subsection (7), include a separate brochure that contains truthful, nonmisleading information regarding:

(i)  the ability of an unborn child to experience pain during an abortion procedure;

(ii)  the measures that may be taken, including the administration of an anesthetic or analgesic to an unborn child, to alleviate or eliminate pain to an unborn child during an abortion procedure;

(iii)  the effectiveness and advisability of taking the measures described in Subsection (5)(c)(ii); and

(iv)  potential medical risks to a pregnant woman that are associated with the administration of an anesthetic or analgesic to an unborn child during an abortion procedure.

(6)  The list described in Subsection (5)(b) shall include:

(a)  private attorneys whose practice includes adoption; and

(b)  the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of each person listed under Subsection (5)(b) or (6)(a).

(7)  A person or facility is not required to provide the information described in Subsection (5)(c) to a patient or potential patient, if the abortion is to be performed:

(a)  on an unborn child who is less than 20 weeks gestational age at the time of the abortion; or

(b)  on an unborn child who is at least 20 weeks gestational age at the time of the abortion, if:

(i)  the abortion is being performed for a reason described in Subsection 76-7-302(3)(b)(i); and

(ii)  due to a serious medical emergency, time does not permit compliance with the requirement to provide the information described in Subsection (5)(c).

(8)  In addition to the requirements described in Subsection (2), the video described in Subsection (1)(b) shall:

(a)  make reference to the list described in Subsection (5)(b); and

(b)  show an ultrasound of the heartbeat of an unborn child at:

(i)  four weeks from conception;

(ii)  six to eight weeks from conception; and

(iii)  each month after ten weeks gestational age, up to 14 weeks gestational age.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 314, 2010 General Session

